Utah statutes.
67-21-10.   False accusations.

(1)  An employee violates this chapter if the employee knowingly makes a false accusation against an employer under this chapter.

(2)  An employee who violates Subsection (1), is subject to:

(a)  a fine not to exceed $5,000; and

(b)  dismissal from employment.



Enacted by Chapter 427, 2013 General Session

